Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.090

Certification—Approval of schools and training.

The secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of schools and alternate training, and may contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in education to assist in evaluating those applying for approval. The standards and procedures set shall apply equally to schools and training within the United States and those in foreign jurisdictions.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 508; 1991 c 3 s 210; 1987 c 412 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.